District of Columbia statutes.
47-2886.12

Display of certificate of registration.

Whoever engages in the practice of engineering shall keep displayed in a conspicuous place in his established place of business the certificate of registration granted him under this part, and evidence of current renewal.

Sept. 19, 1950, 64 Stat. 864, ch. 953, § 12
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 2-2312.
1973 Ed., § 2-1812.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.